Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
3-5-1202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Barrel” means thirty-one gallons (31 gals.);

(2)

“Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any substitute therefor and having an alcoholic content not in excess of five percent (5%) by weight;

(3)

“Beer, malt beverage, and hard cider law or rule” means any law of this state, or any rule promulgated and adopted with respect thereto, that is:

(A)

Applicable to a person applying for or holding a license to manufacture beer, malt beverage, or hard cider; or

(B)

Applicable to a person applying for or holding a license to sell beer, malt beverage, or hard cider in a restaurant for consumption on or off the licensed premises;

(4)

“Board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of this state, or its successor agency;

(5)

“Conflicting beer, malt beverage, or hard cider law or rule” means any beer, malt beverage, or hard cider law or rule that prohibits or conflicts with the otherwise legal licensing and operation of microbrewery-restaurants, as authorized in this subchapter, by requiring any brewer to sell only to a licensed wholesaler, or requiring any licensed retailer to sell only beer, malt beverage, or hard cider purchased from a licensed wholesaler, or prohibiting any brewer or retailer from having any ownership or employment interest in the business of the other or the premises of the other, or requiring that the excise and enforcement tax on beer, malt beverage, or hard cider manufactured by a brewer be paid by a licensed wholesaler, or any beer, malt beverage, or hard cider law or rule of similar direct or indirect effect;

(6)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of this state, or its successor agency;

(7)

“Dry area” means any area in this state in which the manufacture or sale of beer is prohibited by a local-option election heretofore or hereafter held pursuant to applicable laws of this state;

(8)

“Federal regulations” means regulations adopted by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives applicable to and consistent with a microbrewery-restaurant operation as authorized in this subchapter, incorporated herein by this reference, including, but not limited to, 27 C.F.R. Part 25, § 25.25;

(9)

“Malt beverage” means any liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of not less than five percent (5%) nor more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight;

(10)

“Person” means any natural person, partnership, association, or corporation; and

(11)

“Restaurant” means any public or private place which is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the public or to a private or restricted membership as a place where complete meals are actually and regularly served, such place being provided with adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining equipment and a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) people and having employed a sufficient number and kind of employees to prepare, cook, and serve suitable food for its guests or members. At least one (1) meal per day shall be served, and the place shall be open a minimum of five (5) days per week, with the exception of holidays, vacations, and periods of redecorating.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 1995, No. 491, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§ 76, 77.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” twice in the introductory language of (3) and three times in (5).

3-5-1203. Effect on other laws.

Every provision of this subchapter shall be subject to all beer, malt beverage, and hard cider laws and rules, except that conflicting beer, malt beverage, and hard cider laws and rules shall be inapplicable to any provision of this subchapter to the extent that they conflict herewith.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 1995, No. 491, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 78.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice.

3-5-1204. Licenses — Scope — Restrictions.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a microbrewery-restaurant license which shall authorize the licensee to do the following:

(1)(A)

To:

(i)

Operate a microbrewery which shall manufacture one (1) or more varieties of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider in an aggregate quantity not to exceed forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year from all facilities under common ownership with the microbrewery; and

(ii)

Store the manufactured beer, malt beverage, or hard cider and any other beer, malt beverage, or hard cider which the microbrewery-restaurant licensee may purchase from wholesalers and small brewers licensed by this state on the microbrewery-restaurant licensed premises and on the premises of the one (1) separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant authorized under subdivision (a)(9) of this section.

(B)

Two (2) or more microbrewery-restaurants sharing common ownership or a brewery of any size sharing common ownership with a microbrewery-restaurant shall be considered one (1) entity for purposes of:

(i)

Calculating barrel production; and

(ii)

Transportation of beer, malt beverage, or hard cider produced by one (1) entity among no more than three (3) microbrewery- restaurant facilities of the one (1) entity;

(2)

To operate a restaurant which shall be the sales outlet for beer, malt beverage, or hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery and which shall sell the beer, malt beverage, or hard cider and any other beer, malt beverage, hard cider, or wine which the microbrewery-restaurant licensee may purchase from wholesalers licensed by this state for consumption on the licensed premises or purchased directly from licensed small brewers allowed to distribute directly to the microbrewery-restaurant;

(3)(A)

To sell on the premises beer, malt beverage, or hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery or commonly owned facility in brewery-sealed packages at retail directly to the consumer for off-premises consumption on any day of the week; and

(B)

To serve on the premises complimentary samples of beer, malt beverages, or hard cider produced by the microbrewery-restaurant;

(4)(A)

To provide products it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations or sell for resale products it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations holding valid special-event permits as provided for by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, except that the microbrewery-restaurant licensee may not sell to nonprofit organizations holding private club licenses.

(B)

The sale of those products shall be limited to the duration of the particular special event;

(5)

To sell beer, malt beverages, or hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery-restaurant to a nonprofit corporation leasing space in the microbrewery-restaurant or in an adjoining building;

(6)(A)

To sell at retail by the drink or by the package beer produced on the premises of the microbrewery-restaurant if all sales occur in a wet territory and at fairs and food and beer festivals, with the permission and the consent of the management of events.

(B)

A sales and use tax permit is required for sales under this subdivision (a)(6);

(7)

Sell beer, malt beverage, or hard cider of its own manufacture to a wholesale dealer licensed by this state for the purpose of resale to other retail license holders as set forth by §§3-4-605 and3-5-101, dealing with wholesale distribution of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider;

(8)(A)

Conduct beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting events for educational or promotional purposes at any location in wet areas of this state if:

(i)

A request for approval to conduct a beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting event is received by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division at least two (2) weeks before the event;

(ii)

The request is approved by the division; and

(iii)

Written notice is given by the division to the permit holder at least five (5) days before the event.

(B)

Only beer, malt beverage, and hard cider produced by the microbrewery-restaurant shall be used for an event approved under this subdivision (a)(8).

(C)

This subdivision (a)(8) does not authorize the conducting of a beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting event at the one (1) separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant authorized under subdivision (a)(9) of this section; and

(9)(A)

Maintain one (1) separate brewing facility for the production or storage of beer, malt liquor, or hard cider as needed to meet demand, except that each facility used by the microbrewery-restaurant licensee shall not in the aggregate produce more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider per year; and

(B)

Beer, malt beverage, and hard cider produced by a separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant licensee shall be:

(i)

Sold to a licensed wholesaler; or

(ii)

Transported:

(a)

From the separate brewing facility to a microbrewery-restaurant commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for retail sale for consumption on or off the licensed premises; and

(b)

To the separate brewing facility from a microbrewery-restaurant commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for storage, production, or packaging.

(b)

The director shall not issue a microbrewery-restaurant license if the microbrewery-restaurant premises are in a dry area.

(c)(1)

After July 31, 2017, the director shall not issue a microbrewery-restaurant license to a person or entity having more than five percent (5%) common ownership with a person or entity holding a license under the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, §3-5-1401 et seq., or qualifying as a supplier under §3-5-1102.

(2)

However, the director may issue an additional microbrewery-restaurant license after July 31, 2017, to a person or entity holding a microbrewery-restaurant license as of July 31, 2017, and having more than five percent (5%) common ownership with a person or entity if the person or entity holds a license under the Arkansas Small Brewery Act, §3-5-1401 et seq., or qualifies as a supplier under §3-5-1102.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 1995, No. 491, § 3; 1997, No. 916, § 1; 1999, No. 1065, § 2; 2001, No. 805, § 1; 2015, No. 857, § 5; 2017, No. 308, § 1; 2017, No. 865, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Prior to the 2001 amendment, §3-5-1204(b) contained additional language as follows:

“(2)

Any beer and malt beverage produced by the microbrewery-restaurant licensee for sale to a licensed wholesaler shall not be considered as on-premises sales for the purpose of determining Sunday sales eligibility of the restaurant as set forth by the board. (3) Any permittee licensed under this subsection (b) may transport and ship its beer and malt beverages out of state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service, and any common carriers or other appropriate parcel delivery services may accept beer and malt beverages manufactured by the licensee for delivery outside the State of Arkansas to business entities licensed and qualified to accept such products in their respective states.”

The above language was neither set out in nor specifically deleted by Act 805. Because of the omission of subdivisions (2) and (3), the remaining language has been redesignated as (b)(1) and (2).

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 308 substituted “forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year from all facilities under common ownership with the microbrewery” for “twenty thousand (20,000) barrels per year” in (a)(1)(A)(i); inserted “and on the premises of the one (1) separate brewing facility of a microbrewery-restaurant authorized under subdivision (a)(9) of this section” in (a)(1)(A)(ii); redesignated (a)(1)(B) as the present introductory language of (a)(1)(B) and (a)(1)(B)(i); added “for purposes of” in the introductory language of (a)(1)(B); added (a)(1)(B)(ii); inserted “or commonly owned facility” in (a)(3)(A); added (a)(8)(C); and added (a)(9).

The 2017 amendment by No. 865 added (c).

3-5-1205. Fees and taxes.

A microbrewery-restaurant licensee shall:

(1)

Pay any applicable city or county license or permit fees and barrelage or taxes and shall pay a state licensing fee to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per fiscal year to manufacture and sell its beer, malt beverages, and hard cider for consumption both on and off the premises and to sell any other beer, malt beverages, and hard cider purchased from a licensed wholesaler for consumption on the premises;

(2)

Measure beer, malt beverages, and hard cider manufactured by the microbrewery, otherwise comply with applicable rules respecting excise and enforcement tax determination of the beer, malt beverages, and hard cider, and pay any applicable bond or deposit and the amount of the state excise tax and enforcement tax to this state, but free from the fees and taxes provided in §3-5-205, and as required by §§3-7-104 and3-7-111; and

(3)

Pay a tax at the rate of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per barrel, and proportionately for larger and smaller gallonages per barrel, on all beer, malt beverages, and hard cider in quantities of up to forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year produced and sold or offered for sale in the state.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 1995, No. 491, § 4; 1997, No. 916, § 2; 1999, No. 319, § 2; 2009, No. 294, § 15; 2015, No. 857, § 6; 2017, No. 308, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 79.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (3), substituted “two hundred dollars ($200)” for “one hundred fifty dollars ($150)” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment inserted “but free from the fees and taxes provided in §3-5-205, and” in (2); and rewrote (3).

The 2017 amendment substituted “forty-five thousand (45,000)” for “twenty thousand (20,000)” in (3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2).

3-5-1206. Licenses — Application.

No microbrewery-restaurant license shall be issued unless the applicant shall file with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division a verified application, in such form and with such content as the director shall require, accompanied by payment of the applicable fee.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1.

3-5-1207. Operation without license prohibited.

It shall be unlawful and constitute a Class A misdemeanor for any person not holding a valid microbrewery-restaurant license to operate as a microbrewery-restaurant as herein provided.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 193.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “Class A”.

3-5-1208. Rules.

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, and any other applicable agency of this state, shall promulgate and adopt such rules as they deem necessary for the implementation of this subchapter, which rules may consist in whole or in part of the federal regulations.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 611, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 80; 2019, No. 910, § 3324.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading; and substituted “rules” for “regulations” twice.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director”; and made stylistic changes.

Subchapter 13

— Nonresident Beer Seller's Permits

Effective Dates.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 15: July 1, 1995.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 16: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that present law does not adequately protect the people of the State of Arkansas from unscrupulous activities of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer; that the present law does not contain procedures for registration of nonresident manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer, nor enforcement of current laws against such groups; and that the present law does not empower the Alcoholic Beverage Division to effectively monitor the activities of manufacturers, suppliers, brewers and importers of beer. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1999, No. 96, § 11: Feb. 16, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that economic development and the creation of additional jobs for citizens of Arkansas preserves the public peace, health and safety of the State; that the establishment of wholesaler support centers in the State will create additional jobs that would go to other states that are competing for the establishment of such centers, thereby creating the need for our state's business entities to be able to compete for such centers immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

3-5-1301. Short title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Nonresident Beer Seller's Permit Act of 1995”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 1.

3-5-1302. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Beer” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-5-202;

(2)

“Brewery” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-5-202;

(3)

“Division” shall mean the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Finance and Administration of the State of Arkansas;

(4)

“Malt liquor” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-1-102;

(5)

“Manufacturer” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-1-102;

(6)

“Supplier” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-5-1102;

(7)

“Wholesale dealer and distributor” shall have the meaning set forth in §3-5-202; and

(8)

“Wholesaler support center” means a facility located within a wholesaler's premises at which beer and malt are stored by a manufacturer for resale to wholesalers or distributors within or without the state.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 2; 1999, No. 96, § 1.

3-5-1303. When permit required.

(a)

A nonresident seller's permit is required of any manufacturer, brewery, supplier, or other such person who sells or distributes beer or malt to any wholesale dealer and distributor, regardless of whether the sale is consummated inside or outside this state.

(b)(1)

The holder of a nonresident seller's permit may also apply for and receive a wholesaler support center permit.

(2)

An applicant for a wholesaler support center permit must also be the holder of a nonresident seller's permit.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 3; 1999, No. 96, § 2.

3-5-1304. Authorized transactions.

(a)

The holder of a nonresident seller's permit is authorized to:

(1)

Solicit and take orders for beer or malt from a wholesale dealer and distributor; and

(2)

Ship or cause to be shipped into this state beer or malt in consummation of a sale made to a wholesale dealer or distributor.

(b)

Any other provisions of this title notwithstanding, the holder of a wholesaler support center permit is also authorized to:

(1)

Solicit and take orders for beer or malt from a wholesaler dealer and distributor;

(2)

Ship or cause to be shipped into this state to the premises of the wholesaler support center non-tax paid beer or malt for storage and resale to a wholesale dealer or distributor within or without this state;

(3)

Fill orders for beer or malt from in-state wholesale dealers or distributors provided that the receiving in-state wholesaler or distributor pays all applicable state taxes in the same manner as would apply had the wholesaler purchased from an out-of-state nonresident seller permit holder;

(4)

Pay to or compensate a wholesaler or distributor for rented or leased space within the wholesaler's premises for the storage of beer or malt within the confines of the wholesaler support center; and

(5)

Compensate a wholesaler or distributor for the loading, unloading and handling of beer or malt and for administrative and other expenses associated with operating the wholesaler support center on the wholesaler's premises.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 4; 1999, No. 96, § 3.

3-5-1305. Prohibited actions.

No holder of a nonresident seller's permit or wholesaler support center permit nor any officer, director, agent, or employee of the holder nor any affiliate of the holder, regardless of whether the affiliation is corporate or by management, direction, or control, may do any of the following:

(1)

Fail to make or file a report with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division as required by rules of the division;

(2)

Advertise any beer or malt contrary to the laws of this state or to the rules of the division or sell beer or malt for resale in this state in violation of advertising or labeling rules of the division;

(3)

Sell beer or malt for resale inside this state or cause it to be brought into this state in a size of container prohibited by this subchapter or by a rule of the division;

(4)

Solicit or take orders for beer or malt from a person not authorized to import beer or malt into this state for the purpose of resale. Provided, however, a nonresident beer seller permittee also holding a wholesaler support center permit may engage in those activities set forth in §3-5-1304(b);

(5)

Induce, persuade, or influence or attempt to induce, persuade, or influence a person to violate this subchapter or a rule of the division or conspire with a person to violate this subchapter or a rule of the division;

(6)

Exercise a privilege granted by a nonresident seller's permit while an order or suspension against the permit is in effect;

(7)

Take or fail to take any action that would cause any type of fixing of wholesale or retail prices in the state. Suggestion of wholesale or retail prices will not be considered to be a violation of this provision;

(8)

Do any other act by a supplier in violation of §3-5-1107;

(9)

Hold any wholesaler's permit under §3-5-206; or

(10)

Do any other act that violates any regulation adopted by the division.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 5; 1999, No. 96, § 4.

3-5-1306. Application for permit.

(a)

Any manufacturer, importer, or other person desiring to obtain a nonresident seller's permit or wholesaler support center permit may make application for such to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division on forms provided by the division.

(b)(1)(A)

In addition, every applicant for a nonresident seller's permit shall pay to the division an annual permit fee of three hundred fifty dollars ($350) if the applicant shipped, sold, or otherwise distributed fewer than two hundred (200) barrels, as defined for excise tax purposes under this Code, of any beer or malt in this state in the year immediately preceding the application.

(B)

If the applicant shipped, sold, or otherwise distributed in this state from two hundred (200) to one thousand (1,000) barrels in the year immediately preceding application, the applicant shall pay an annual permit fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(C)

If the applicant shipped, sold, or otherwise distributed in this state more than one thousand (1,000) barrels in the year immediately preceding application, the applicant shall pay an annual permit fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2)

Each holder of a nonresident seller's permit shall pay the permit fee based on the previous calendar year's shipments into the state.

(c)(1)(A)

Each permit shall be valid for one (1) fiscal year which shall run from the first day of July to the last day of June.

(B)

Any applicant receiving a permit during the course of any fiscal year shall not be relieved of the obligation to pay the full amount of the annual permit fee.

(2)(A)

As long as a permit has not been revoked or cancelled, it shall be renewable for successive years upon the payment of the appropriate annual permit fee on or before June 30 of each calendar year.

(B)

Any person not renewing the permit described in subsection (b) of this section on or before June 30 shall be subject to the penalties and provisions provided for in §3-4-216.

(d)

An applicant for a wholesaler support center permit shall pay an annual permit fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 6; 1999, No. 96, § 5; 2009, No. 294, § 16, 17.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b), substituted “three hundred fifty dollars ($350)” for “one hundred dollars ($100)” in (b)(1)(A), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “five hundred dollars ($500)” in (b)(1)(B), substituted “two thousand dollars ($2,000)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in (b)(2); substituted “two thousand dollars ($2,000)” for “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in (d); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

3-5-1307. Wholesale dealers and distributors to import from nonresident seller permittees only.

(a)

No wholesale dealer and distributor licensed under §3-5-206 may purchase or order any malt beverage for importation into the state from any source other than one possessed of a nonresident seller's permit.

(b)

No such wholesale dealer and distributor may purchase or order any beer or malt liquor for importation into this state from any permittee whose permit has been revoked or suspended after such wholesaler has received notice of the revocation or suspension.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 7.

3-5-1308. Nonresident seller to be primary American source of supply — Definition.

(a)

No holder of a nonresident seller's permit or wholesaler support center permit may solicit, accept, or fill an order for beer or malt from a holder of any type of wholesaler's permit unless the nonresident seller or wholesaler support center permittee is the primary American source of supply for the brand of beer or malt which is ordered.

(b)(1)

In this section, “primary American source of supply” shall mean:

(A)(i)

The producer;

(ii)

The owner of the commodity at the time it becomes a marketable product; or

(iii)

The bottler; or

(B)

The exclusive agent of any of those.

(2)

To be the “primary American source of supply”, the nonresident seller or wholesaler support center permittee must be the first source, that is, the closest source to the manufacturer, in the channel of commerce from whom the product can be secured by persons conducting business in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 8; 1999, No. 96, § 6.

3-5-1309. Investigation of permittees.

(a)

If a representative of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration wishes to examine the book accounts, records, minutes, letters, memoranda, documents, checks, telegrams, constitution and bylaws, or other records of a nonresident seller's permittee or wholesaler support center permittee, he or she shall make a written request to the permittee or his or her duly authorized manager or representative or, if the permittee is a corporation, to any officer of the corporation.

(b)

When a request for an examination is made, the person to whom it is directed shall immediately allow the representative to conduct the examination.

(c)

The representative may investigate the organization, conduct, and management of any nonresident seller's permittee or wholesaler support center permittee and may make copies of any records which in the judgment of the representative may show or tend to show that the permittee has violated the law, a regulation, or the terms of his or her permit.

(d)

A representative may not make public any information obtained under this section except to a law enforcement officer of this state or in connection with an administrative or judicial proceeding in which the state or the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is a party concerning the cancellation or suspension of a nonresident seller's permit or wholesaler support center permit, the collection of taxes due under state law, or the violation of state law.

(e)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may revoke or suspend a nonresident seller's permit or wholesaler support center permit in accordance with this title if the permittee or his or her authorized representative fails or refuses to permit an examination authorized by this section or to permit the making of copies of any documents as provided by this section, without regard to whether the document is inside or outside the state, or if the permittee or his or her authorized representative fails or refuses to answer a question of an officer incident to an examination or investigation in progress.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 9; 1999, No. 96, § 7.

3-5-1310. Administrative sanctions.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board are empowered to administer the full range of penalties available for other administrative proceedings before it, including, but not limited to, fines, suspension, cancellation, or revocation of such permits which have been found to be in violation of the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

Any violation of this subchapter shall be classified as a Class A permit violation pursuant to the terms of §3-4-402.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 537, § 10.

Subchapter 14

— Arkansas Small Brewery Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-1401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Small Brewery Act”.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 1; 2015, No. 857, § 7.

3-5-1402. Legislative determinations and intent.

(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

The creation and long-term success of small businesses in this state is vital to the continued economic well-being and prosperity of the State of Arkansas; and

(2)

All reasonable steps should be taken to retain, foster, and encourage small business and to create favorable conditions for small business in this state.

(b)

It is the intent and purpose of this subchapter to authorize the legal operation of native breweries in order to assure that these favorable conditions exist in this state.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 2.

3-5-1403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Barrel” means thirty-one gallons (31 gals.);

(2)

“Beer” means any fermented liquor made from malt or any substitute having an alcoholic content of not more than five percent (5%) by weight;

(3)

“Brewery” means a small brewery or contract brewing company;

(4)

“Contract brewing company” means any licensed brewery that hires another company to produce a portion of its beer, malt beverage, or hard cider;

(5)

“Front-of-house employee” means an employee of a small brewery not involved in the production or transportation of brewery beer or wholesale activities of the brewery, including without limitation:

(A)

A bartender;

(B)

A host;

(C)

Kitchen staff;

(D)

Janitorial staff; and

(E)

Servers;

(6)

“Hard cider” means liquor brewed from the fermented juices of fruit and containing more than three percent (3%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) alcohol by weight;

(7)

“Malt beverage” means any liquor brewed from the fermented juices of grain and having an alcoholic content of no less than five percent (5%) nor more than twenty-one percent (21%) by weight;

(8)

“Person” means any natural person, partnership, association, or corporation;

(9)

“Restaurant” means a public or private place that:

(A)

Is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the public or to a private or restricted membership as a place where complete meals are actually and regularly served;

(B)

Provides adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining equipment;

(C)

Has a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) persons;

(D)

Employs a sufficient number and variety of employees to prepare, cook, and serve suitable food for its guests or members;

(E)

Serves at least one (1) meal per day; and

(F)

Is open a minimum of five (5) days per week, with the exception of holidays, vacations, and periods of redecorating;

(10)(A)

“Small brewery” means any licensed facility located in Arkansas that manufactures fewer than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider per year for sale or consumption.

(B)

“Small brewery” does not include a microbrewery-restaurant; and

(11)

“Small brewery tap room” means a small brewery off-premises retail site located in a wet territory holding a small brewery license.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 3; 2009, No. 1459, § 1; 2015, No. 857, § 8; 2015, No. 1237, § 2; 2017, No. 950, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted former (3), which defined “board,” and redesignated the subsequent subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “thirty thousand (30,000)” for “60,000” in present (13).

The 2015 amendment by No. 857 deleted the definitions for “Director”, “Microbrewery-restaurant”, “Native brewer”, “Producer brewer”, and “Restaurant”; rewrote the definition of “Small brewery”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1237 inserted the definition of “Hard cider”; inserted “and hard cider” after “malt beverages” throughout the section, and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment added the definitions for “Front-of-house employee”, “Restaurant”, “Small brewery tap room”; and redesignated the subdivisions accordingly.

3-5-1404. Effect on other laws.

Every provision of this subchapter is subject to all beer, malt beverage, and hard cider laws and rules not in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 81.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.